Hawaii statutes.
[§231-9.4 Credit or debit card
remittances.] In addition to sections 237-31, 237D-6.5, and 251-5, as well
as any other form of payment allowed under provisions of title 14 administered
by the department, the director, by rules adopted pursuant to chapter 91, may
permit the use of credit or debit cards for remittances made to the
department. A service fee shall not be required by the department for the use
of debit cards for remittances, but may be required by the department for the
use of credit cards for remittances.

For purposes of this section:

"Credit card" shall have the same
meaning as provided in section 478-1.

"Debit card" means any card, plate,
or other single credit device issued with or without a fee to a cardholder to
purchase goods or services or to obtain cash that is debited from the
cardholder's checking or other bank account. [L 1997, c 179, §1]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next